Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-662
Construction and repair; failure of property owner; power of city.

In case the owner or owners of any lot, lots, or lands abutting on any street or avenue, or part thereof in a city of the first class, shall fail to construct or repair any sidewalk in front of his, her, or their lot, lots, or lands within the time and in the manner as directed and requested by the mayor and city council, after having received due notice to do so, they shall be liable for all damages or injury occasioned by reason of the defective or dangerous condition of any sidewalk, and the mayor and city council shall have power to cause such sidewalk to be constructed or repaired and assess the cost thereof against such property.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, LV, p. 259;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 4, p. 307;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4946;

C.S.1922, § 4115;

C.S.1929, § 16-644;

R.S.1943, § 16-662;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 113;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 58.